Connecticut, session 2026, SB00240.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Mental Health
and Addiction services shall develop a comprehensive public health
plan to (1) identify, prevent and reduce the risks associated with Internet
gaming disorder, and (2) identify any link between Internet gaming
disorder and gambling behaviors. The plan shall include data
monitoring, public education, early screening, health care provider
training, evidence-based treatment pathways and coordination with
existing gambling harm prevention efforts with particular attention to
reducing harm to youth and other vulnerable populations. Not later
than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall report on such plan, in
accordance with section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public health.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 1585 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 240
Section 1 from passage New section